Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7429
Blood, defined.

Blood means whole blood collected from a single donor and processed either for transfusion or further manufacturing.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7403;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 3.